Hawaii statutes.
§326-27 Kalaupapa store; loans for
operation and maintenance. (a) All moneys to enable the department of
health to operate and maintain the Kalaupapa store, situated in Kalaupapa,
Molokai, shall be allocated by the legislature through appropriations out of
the state general fund.

(b) The department shall include in its
budgetary request for each upcoming fiscal period, the amounts necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this section.

(c) All moneys received in reimbursement of
payments made under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state
general fund. [L 1915, c 15, §1; RL 1925, §1202; am L 1931, c 139, §5; am L
1933, c 118, §1; RL 1935, §1165; RL 1945, §2428; RL 1955, §50-29; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §19; HRS §326-27; am L 1993, c 280, §38]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next